New Jersey, session 221, A1709.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.18A:29-5 is amended to read as follows: 18A:29-5.  The minimum salary of a full-time teaching staff member in any school district or educational services commission who is certified by the local board of education or the board of directors of the educational services commission as performing [his] the members duties in an acceptable manner for the previous [academic] school year [pursuant to N.J.A. C. 6:3-1.19 and 6:3-1.21] and who is not employed as a substitute on a day-to-day basis shall be [$18,500.00] $60,000 for [an academic] a school year and a proportionate amount for less than [an academic] a school year. The minimum salary of a full-time teaching staff member, who holds a masters degree or higher degree, in any school district or educational services commission who is certified by the local board of education or the board of directors of the educational services commission as performing the members duties in an acceptable manner for the previous school year and who is not employed as a substitute on a day-to-day basis shall be $61,500 for a school year and a proportionate amount for less than a school year. [For the purpose of this amendatory and supplementary act] As used in this section, "full-time" means the number of days of employment in each week and the period of time in each day required by regulations of the State board to qualify a person as a full-time teaching staff member. [In addition this] The minimum [salary] salary amounts established pursuant to this section shall also apply to all new full-time teaching staff members hired for the [1985-86 academic] 2022-2023 school year and thereafter. (cf: P.L.1986, c.9, s.1) 2.  Section 4 of P.L.1985, c.321 (C.18A:29-5.3) is amended to read as follows: 4.  No salary schedule for full-time teaching staff members adopted by any board of education or any educational services commission shall provide for salaries lower than [as prescribed by this amendatory and supplementary act] the minimum salary amounts established under N.J.S.18A:29-5. (cf: P.L.1986, c.9, s.2) 3.    Section 6 of P.L.1985, c.321 (C.18A:29-5.5) is amended to read as follows: 6.    Teachers receiving more than the minimum salary amounts set forth in [this amendatory and supplementary act] N.J.S.18A:29-5 shall not receive automatic salary increases pursuant to any existing collective negotiations agreement with a salary guide indexed to compute salaries on the basis of a ratio established between the minimum salary and all other ranges, increments, or increases. (cf: P.L.1985, c.321, s.6) 4.    Section 7 of P.L.1985, c.321 (C.18A:29-5.6) is amended to read as follows: 7.    a.  The actual salary paid to each teacher under each district's or educational services commission's [1984-85] 2021-2022 approved salary guide shall be considered a base salary for purposes of this act. b.    In addition to all other funds to which the local district or educational services commission is entitled under the provisions of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) and other pertinent statutes, each board of education or board of directors of an educational services commission shall receive from the State during the [1985-86 academic] 2022-2023 school year [and for two years thereafter an] 100 percent of the amount equal to the sum of the amounts by which the actual salary prescribed for each current full-time teaching staff member under the salary schedule adopted by the local board of education or board of directors for the [1984-85 academic] 2021-2022 school year in the manner prescribed by law is less than [$18,500.00] $60,000, or $61,500 in the case of a full-time teaching staff member holding a masters degree or higher degree, provided that the teaching staff member has been certified by the local board of education or board of directors as performing [his] the members duties in an acceptable manner for the [1984-85] 2021-2022 school year [pursuant to N.J.A.C.6:3-1.19 and 6:3-1.21]. During the 2023-2024 school year, each board of education or board of directors shall receive from the State 80 percent of that amount; during the 2024-2025 school year, 60 percent of that amount; during the 2025-2026 school year, 40 percent of that amount; during the 2026-2027 school year, 20 percent of that amount; and during the 2027-2028 school year and each subsequent school year, zero percent of that amount. Each local board of education or board of directors shall receive from the State on behalf of the newly employed full-time teaching staff members for the [1985-86 academic] 2022-2023 school year [and for two years thereafter an] 100 percent of the amount equal to the sum of the amounts by which the actual salary prescribed for each newly employed full-time teaching staff member under the salary schedule adopted by the local board of education or board of directors for the [1984-85 academic] 2021-2022 school year is less than [$18,500.00] $60,000 or $61,500 in the case of a full-time teaching staff member holding a masters degree or higher degree. During the 2023-2024 school year, each board of education or board of directors shall receive from the State 80 percent of that amount; during the 2024-2025 school year, 60 percent of that amount; during the 2025-2026 school year, 40 percent of that amount; during the 2026-2027 school year, 20 percent of that amount; and during the 2027-2028 school year and each subsequent school year, zero percent of that amount. All adjustments for teachers who are hired or who leave employment during the school year and who make less than [$18,500.00] $60,000 or $61,500 in the case of a full-time teaching staff member holding a masters degree or higher degree shall be made in the school year following the year in which they were hired or left employment. c.     [For the 1988-89 academic year and thereafter, this act shall be funded in accordance with the recommendations of the State and Local Expenditure and Revenue Policy Commission created pursuant to P.L.1984, c.213.  If the commission's recommendations for funding this program are not enacted into law, this act shall be funded in accordance with subsection d. of this section and sections 9 and 10 of P.L.1985, c.321 (C.18A:29-5.8 and C.18A:29-5.9).] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) d.    [For the purpose of funding this act in the 1988-89 academic year as determined pursuant to this section, each teacher's salary based on the 1984-85 salary guide shall be increased by the product of the base salary multiplied by 21%.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) e.     [In each subsequent year the product of the base salary times 7% shall be cumulatively added to each teacher's salary as calculated in subsection d. of this section in determining the aid payable.  In any year subsequent to the 1987-88 academic year in which the base salary plus the cumulative increases under this section exceed $18,500.00, aid will no longer be payable.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (cf: P.L.2007, c.260, s.56) 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.